Hawaii statutes.
§412:9-304 Consumer loan charges.
Unless specifically authorized in this article or by rule adopted by the
commissioner, a financial services loan company shall only have the right to
charge, contract for, and receive in advance or otherwise, the following
charges in addition to the interest permitted in section 412:9-302 for a
consumer loan made under this article, including but not limited to a
first-lien mortgage loan:

(1) Late charges under the consumer loan on any
delinquent installment, or portion of the delinquent installment where there
has been no extension or deferment. Delinquency occurs when the installment or
payment is not paid on the due date. Late charges shall not be collected more
than once for the same delinquent installment. Late charges on any consumer
loan shall not exceed five per cent of the delinquent installment, and late
charges shall not be assessed on any consumer loan after acceleration of the
maturity of the consumer loan;

(2) A prepayment penalty as provided in the note or
other form of contract signed by the borrower on any amount that is voluntarily
prepaid; provided that:

(A) The prepayment penalty on any consumer
loan with a term of five years or more that is primarily secured by an interest
in real property and in which the interest rate is computed under section
412:9-301(2) and which is prepaid within five years of the date of the loan
shall be computed on the amount prepaid in excess of twenty per cent of the
original principal amount of the loan in any twelve-month period measured from
the date of the loan or from any anniversary of the loan date. The prepayment
penalty may be charged only on amounts in excess of the twenty per cent amount
in each twelve-month period in such five-year period and shall not exceed six
months of interest at the then-applicable loan interest rate on the amount
prepaid; provided that the interest rate is permissible under applicable usury
law;

(B) The prepayment penalty shall not be
charged on a consumer loan that is a variable rate or open-end loan, on a
precomputed loan on which interest is computed under section 412:9-301(1), or
on loans that are not secured by real estate; and

(C) The prepayment penalty shall not be
charged on any amount that is paid because of the exercise of any acceleration
provision by the financial services loan company;

(3) Extension or deferment charges on any payment on
account of the principal balance of a loan, or a portion thereof, that is due
on a particular date, but is extended or deferred to a later date by mutual
agreement. The charges shall be based upon the amount so extended or deferred
at interest not exceeding that permitted upon the original loan under section
412:9-302, for the actual period of the extension or deferment. The extension or
deferment charges may be collected either in advance at the commencement of the
period of extension or deferment or otherwise as agreed. The term and
conditions of the extension or deferment, including the amount of the consumer
loan so extended or deferred, and the period of, and the charge for the
extension or deferment shall be set forth in writing and signed by the borrower
with one copy given to the borrower;

(4) Nonrefundable discount, points, loan fees, and
loan origination charges; provided that:

(A) Discount, points, loan fees, and loan
origination charges shall not be charged on precomputed loans on which interest
is computed under section 412:9-301(1); and

(B) The nonrefundable discount, points, loan
fees, and loan origination charges shall be permitted on consumer loans on
which interest is computed under section 412:9-301(2) if the consumer loan is
secured by an interest in real property or if the consumer loan is made to a
lessee of land subject to the Hawaiian Homes Commission Act and the loan, but
for the provisions of the Act, would be secured by a mortgage on the leasehold
interest. Provided further that, except for open-end loans, the nonrefundable
discount, points, loan fees, and origination charges shall be included as
interest to determine compliance of the loan with the interest rate limits
under section 412:9-302(b)(2) when the consumer loan is made.

The nonrefundable discount, points, loan fees,
and loan origination charges shall be fully earned on the date the loan
commitment agreement or other form of contract is executed and the commitment
fee paid, or on the date the consumer loan is made, and shall not be subject to
refund on prepayment of the consumer loan;

(5) Fees, charges, and expenses reasonably related to
the consumer loan that are retained by the financial services loan company;
provided that the fees, charges, and expenses are charged only on consumer
loans that are secured by an interest in real property; and provided further
that the total dollar amount of the fees, charges, and expenses, whether or not
itemized, shall not exceed one per cent of the principal amount of the loan.
The fees, charges, and expenses may include but are not limited to notary fees,
appraisal fees, appraisal review fees, and fees for the development,
processing, and preparation of loan documents, including deeds, promissory
notes, mortgages, and reconveyance, settlement, and similar documents;

(6) Fees, charges, and expenses reasonably related to
the consumer loan that are actually paid to third parties, affiliates, or
subsidiaries for services actually rendered, no portion of which is rebated,
refunded, or paid directly or indirectly to the financial services loan company
by the third parties, affiliates, or subsidiaries. The fees, charges, and
expenses may include but are not limited to charges for credit reports, actual
taxes, and fees charged by a governmental agency for recording, filing, or
entering of record any security agreements or instruments, including the
partial or complete release of such security agreements or instruments,
insurance premiums of the kind and to the extent described in paragraph (2) of
subsection (e) of section 226.4 of Regulation Z of the Board of Governors of
the Federal Reserve System and to the extent that the insurance premium does
not exceed $20, appraisal fees, appraisal review fees, title report or title
insurance fees, mortgage reserve funds to be used for payment of taxes,
insurance, lease rent and condominium assessments, real property tax services
fees, wire transfer fees, and attorney's fees and expenses for documentation of
the consumer loan or for the collection of any consumer loan in default. [L
1993, c 350, pt of §1; am L 1995, c 26, §2, c 39, §1, and c 44, §1; am L 1997,
c 158, §2; am L 2005, c 38, §2; am L 2008, c 196, §7]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next